Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-12] Report of open-market sale.
(a) Unless required to do so within a shorter time by chapter 668, a broker
appointed under section 668A-11(b) to offer heirs property for open-market sale
shall file a report not later than seven days after receiving an offer to
purchase the property for at least the value determined under section 668A-7 or
668A-11.

(b) The report required by subsection (a)
shall contain the following information:

(1) A description of the property to be sold to each
buyer;

(2) The name of each buyer;

(3) The proposed purchase price;

(4) The terms and conditions of the proposed sale,
including, without limitation, the terms of any owner financing;

(5) The amounts to be paid to lienholders;

(6) A statement of contractual or other arrangements
or conditions of the broker's commission; and

(7) Other material facts relevant to the sale. [L
2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next